District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.31

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Applicant” means any person who has filed any written employment application forms to work as a District employee, or has been tentatively selected for employment.

(2)

“Child” means an individual 12 years of age and under.

(3)

“District employee” means a person employed by the District of Columbia government.

(4)

“Drug” means an unlawful drug and does not include over-the-counter prescription medications.

(5)

“Employee” means any person employed in a position for which he or she is paid for services on any basis.

(6)

“Post-accident employee” means an employee of the District of Columbia, who, while on duty, is involved in a vehicular or other type of accident resulting in personal injury or property damage, or both, in which the cause of the accident could reasonably be believed to have been the result, in whole or in part, from the use of drugs or alcohol on the part of the employee.

(7)

“Probable cause” or “reasonable suspicion” means a reasonable belief by a supervisor that an employee in a safety-sensitive position is under the influence of an illegal drug or alcohol to the extent that the employee’s ability to perform his or her job is impaired.

(8)

“Random testing” means drug or alcohol testing conducted on an District employee in a safety-sensitive position at an unspecified time for purposes of determining whether any District employee subject to drug or alcohol testing has used drugs or alcohol and, as a result, is unable to satisfactorily perform his or her employment duties.

(9)

“Reasonable suspicion referral” means referral of an employee in a safety-sensitive position for testing by the District for drug or alcohol use.

(10)

“Safety-sensitive position” means:

(A)

Employment in which the District employee has direct contact with children or youth;

(B)

Is entrusted with the direct care and custody of children or youth; and

(C)

Whose performance of his or her duties in the normal course of employment may affect the health, welfare, or safety of children or youth.

(11)

“Youth” means an individual between 13 and 17 years of age, inclusive.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2031
as added Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 102, 52 DCR 2331
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-164, June 25, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 6500).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-2, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3782).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-117, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3804).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-319, on April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4708).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-310, March 26, 2002, 49 DCR 3420).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-3, January 22, 2003, 50 DCR 1426).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-71, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3593).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-279, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 60).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-407, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3659).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).